nb: Viklingsstil: Dobbelt omslag; Enkelt omslag; Annet
fr: Style d’enroulement: Double tour; Simple tour; Autre
pt-BR: Envoltório estilo: Volta dupla; Volta única; Outros
lt-LT: Apvyniojimo stilius: Dvigubas apvyniojimas; Viengubas apvyniojimas; Kita
ro-RO: Stilul de înfășurare: Înfășurare dublă; Înfășurare simplă; Altele
th: สไตล์การห่อ: พันสองรอบ; พันรอบเดียว; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Stil omota: Dvostruko omotavanje; Jednostruko omotavanje; Ostalo
en: Wrap style: Double wrap; Single wrap; Other
sl-SI: Stil ovijanja: Dvojni ovitek; Enojni ovitek; Drugo
zh-CN: 缠绕风格: 双层缠绕; 单层缠绕; 其他
pt-PT: Estilo de envolvimento: Volta dupla; Volta simples; Outro
cs: Styl omotání: Dvojité omotání; Jednoduché omotání; Jiné
tr: Sarma stili: Çift dolama; Tek dolama; Diğer
fi: Kietaisutyyli: Kaksinkertainen kääre; Yksinkertainen kääre; Muu
it: Stile di avvolgimento: Doppio giro; Giro singolo; Altro
ja: ラップスタイル: ダブルラップ; シングルラップ; その他
vi: Kiểu quấn: Quấn đôi; Quấn đơn; Khác
bg-BG: Стил на навиване: Двойно увиване; Единично увиване; Друго
pl: Styl owijania: Podwójne owinięcie; Pojedyncze owinięcie; Inne
da: Viklestil: Dobbelt omvikling; Enkelt omvikling; Andet
sv: Typ av lindning: Dubbel lindning; Enkel lindning; Övrigt
hu: Körbefutó stílus: Dupla tekerés; Szimpla tekerés; Egyéb
es: Estilo de envoltura: Envoltura doble; Envoltura simple; Otro
ko: 랩 방식: 더블 랩; 싱글 랩; 기타
ru: Стиль обмотки: В два оборота; В один оборот; Другое
de: Wickelstil: Doppelt gewickelt; Einfach gewickelt; Sonstige
sk-SK: Štýl obalu: Dvojité omotanie; Jednoduché omotanie; Iné
zh-TW: 纏繞樣式: 雙圈纏繞; 單圈纏繞; 其他
el: Στυλ τυλίγματος: Διπλό τύλιγμα; Μονό τύλιγμα; Άλλο
nl: Wikkel stijl: Dubbele wikkeling; Enkele wikkeling; Overig